Illinois, session 104th, HB818.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The Motor Fuel Tax Law is amended by changing 5Section 20 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 505/20)  (from Ch. 120, par. 434)7    Sec. 20. This act may be cited as the the "Motor Fuel Tax 8Law."9(Source: Laws 1929, p. 625.)